Hawaii statutes.
§803-6 Arrest, how made. (a) At or
before the time of making an arrest, the person shall declare that the person
is an officer of justice, if such is the case. If the person has a warrant the
person should show it; or if the person makes the arrest without warrant in any
of the cases in which it is authorized by law, the person should give the party
arrested clearly to understand for what cause the person undertakes to make the
arrest, and shall require the party arrested to submit and be taken to the police
station or judge. This done, the arrest is complete.

(b) In any case in which it is lawful for a
police officer to arrest a person without a warrant for a misdemeanor, petty
misdemeanor or violation, the police officer may, but need not, issue a citation
in lieu of the requirements of [subsection] (a), if the police officer finds
and is reasonably satisfied that the person:

(1) Will appear in court at the time designated;

(2) Has no outstanding arrest warrants which would
justify the person's detention or give indication that the person might fail to
appear in court; and

(3) That the offense is of such nature that there
will be no further police contact on or about the date in question, or in the
immediate future.

(c) The citation shall contain:

(1) The name and current address of the offender;

(2) The last four digits of the offender's social
security number;

(3) A description of the offender;

(4) The nature of the offense;

(5) The time and date of the offense;

(6) A notice of time and date for court appearance;

(7) The signature and badge number of the officer;

(8) The signature of the offender agreeing to court
appearance;

(9) Any remarks; and

(10) A notice directing the offender to appear at the
time and place designated to stand trial for the offense indicated and a notice
that failure to obey the citation may result in a fine or imprisonment, or
both.

(d) Where a citation has been issued in lieu
of the requirements of subsection (a), the officer who issues the summons or
citation may subscribe to the complaint:

(1) Under oath administered by any police officer
whose name has been submitted to the prosecuting officer and who has been
designated by the chief of police to administer the oath; or

(2) By declaration in accordance with the rules of
court.

(e) If a person fails to appear in answer to
the citation; or if there is reasonable cause to believe that the person will
not appear, a warrant for the person's arrest may be issued. A knowing failure
to appear in answer to the citation may be punished by a fine of not more than
$1,000 or imprisonment of not more than thirty days or both. [PC 1869, c 49,
§6; RL 1925, §3972; RL 1935, §5405; RL 1945, §10706; am L 1953, c 42, §1; RL
1955, §255-6; HRS §708-6; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 64, §1; am L
1978, c 228, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 179, §1; am L 2002, c 71, §1; am L
2007, c 13, §1]

Cross References

Territorial limits of warrant, see §604-13.

Rules of Court

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Case Notes

Proper manner of making arrest. 1 H. 72 (1852); 3 U.S.D.C.
Haw. 239 (1907).

After legal arrest person becomes lawful prisoner. 8 H. 185.

Law does not make it imperative that the officer declare that
he is an officer before he puts his hand on the supposed offender. 9 H. 522
(1894).

Arrest, when complete. 62 H. 99, 612 P.2d 102 (1980); 72 H.
360, 817 P.2d 1060 (1991).

Arrest was reasonable response to situation even though
offense was simple trespass. 64 H. 130, 637 P.2d 1105 (1981).

Does not require arresting officer to inform arrested person
of exact offense; arrest for "investigation of a shooting incident"
is sufficient. 67 H. 174, 681 P.2d 984 (1984).

"Arrest" may involve either (1) taking the alleged
violator into extended physical custody or (2) issuing the individual a
citation. 84 H. 295, 933 P.2d 632 (1997).

Police officers have authority to order alleged violators out
of their vehicles in the case of traffic-related criminal offenses, but not in
the case of traffic violations or when statutorily required to issue a
citation. 84 H. 295, 933 P.2d 632 (1997).

Where police had probable cause to arrest defendant without a
warrant for fourth degree theft, a petty misdemeanor under §708-833, and simple
trespass, a violation under §708-815, and this section authorized them to cite,
rather than arrest, defendant for those offenses if defendant did not have any
outstanding arrest warrants, outstanding warrant check on defendant by police
not unconstitutional. 91 H. 111 (App.), 979 P.2d 1137 (1999).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next